Washington statutes.
RCW 18.34.120

Renewal registration fee—Continuing education.

Each licensee hereunder shall pay a renewal registration fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The secretary may adopt rules establishing mandatory continuing education requirements to be met by persons applying for license renewal.

[ 1996 c 191 s 18; 1991 c 3 s 79; 1984 c 279 s 52; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 35; 1957 c 43 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.